Nebraska, session 109, LB594.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB594 LB594
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-6,179.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is amended to read:
60-6,179.01 (1) This section does not apply to an operator of a
commercial motor vehicle if section 60-6,179.02 applies.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
no person shall physically hold or support with any part of his or her
body, or otherwise use, a handheld wireless communication device while
operating a motor vehicle that is in motion. to read a written
communication, manually type a written communication, or send a written
communication while operating a motor vehicle which is in motion.
(3)(a) (3) The prohibition in subsection (2) of this section does
not apply to:
(i) (a) A person performing his or her official duties as a law
enforcement officer, a firefighter, an ambulance driver, or an emergency
medical technician; or
(ii) Any employee or contractor of a utility service provider who is
responding to a utility emergency; or
(iii) (b) A person operating a motor vehicle in an emergency
situation, but only if such person is communicating or attempting to
communicate with emergency services.
(b) The prohibition in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (c) of this
section does not apply to any person who is operating a motor vehicle
that is in motion if such person is using the handheld wireless
communication device:
(i) Without touching such handheld wireless communication device; or
(ii) To initiate a function of such handheld wireless communication
device with a single touch.
(4) Enforcement of this section by state or local law enforcement
agencies shall be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver
of a motor vehicle has been cited or charged with a traffic violation or
some other offense.
-2-

LB594 LB594
2025 2025
(4) (5) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a
traffic infraction. Any person who is found guilty of a traffic
infraction under this section shall be assessed points on his or her
motor vehicle operator's license pursuant to section 60-4,182 and shall
be fined:
(a) Two hundred dollars for the first offense;
(b) Three hundred dollars for a second offense; and
(c) Five hundred dollars for a third and subsequent offense.
(5) (6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Commercial motor vehicle has the same meaning as in section
75-362;
(b)(i) Handheld wireless communication device means any device that
provides for written communication between two or more parties and is
capable of receiving, displaying, or transmitting written communication.
(ii) Handheld wireless communication device includes, but is not
limited to, a mobile or cellular telephone, a text messaging device, a
personal digital assistant, a pager, or a laptop computer.
(iii) Handheld wireless communication device does not include an
electronic device that is part of the motor vehicle or permanently
attached to the motor vehicle or a handsfree wireless communication
device; and
(c) Written communication includes, but is not limited to, a text
message, an instant message, electronic mail, and Internet websites.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-6,179.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-